Hawaii statutes.
[§269-27.5] Construction of high-voltage
electric transmission lines; hearing. Whenever a public utility plans to
place, construct, erect, or otherwise build a new 46 kilovolt or greater
high-voltage electric transmission system above the surface of the ground
through any residential area, the public utilities commission shall conduct a
public hearing prior to its issuance of approval thereof. Notice of the
hearing shall be given in the manner provided in section 269-16 for notice of
public hearings. [L 1976, c 11, §2]

Case Notes

Where general public had substantial opportunity to provide
input, public utilities commission had established necessary procedures by
which ratepayers could manifest their consent in order to persuade commission
that cost of underground routing of transmission lines was acceptable. 81 H.
459, 918 P.2d 561.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next